Missouri, session 2026, HB2662.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 301.020 and 307.350, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 301.020 and 307.350, to read as follows:
301.020. 1. Every owner of a motor vehicle or trailer, which shall be operated or
driven upon the highways of this state, except as herein otherwise expressly provided, shall
annually file, by mail or otherwise, in the office of the director of revenue, an application for
registration on a blank form to be furnished by the director of revenue for that purpose
containing:
(1) A brief description of the motor vehicle or trailer to be registered, including the
name of the manufacturer, the vehicle identification number, the amount of motive power of
the motor vehicle, stated in figures of horsepower and whether the motor vehicle is to be
registered as a motor vehicle primarily for business use as defined in section 301.010;
(2) The name, the applicant's identification number and address of the owner of such
motor vehicle or trailer; and
(3) The gross weight of the vehicle and the desired load in pounds if the vehicle is a
commercial motor vehicle or trailer.
2. If the vehicle is a motor vehicle primarily for business use as defined in section
301.010 and if such vehicle is [ten years of age or lessand] model year 2000 or newer orhas
less than one hundred fifty thousand miles on the odometer, the director of revenue shall
retain the odometer information provided in the vehicle inspection report, and provide for
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2662 2
prompt access to such information, together with the vehicle identification number for the
motor vehicle to which such information pertains, for a period of ten years after the receipt of
such information. This section shall not apply unless:
(1) The application for the vehicle's certificate of ownership was submitted after July
1, 1989; and
(2) The certificate was issued pursuant to a manufacturer's statement of origin.
3. If the vehicle is any motor vehicle other than a motor vehicle primarily for business
use, a recreational motor vehicle, motorcycle, motortricycle, autocycle, bus, or any
commercial motor vehicle licensed for over twelve thousand pounds and if such motor
vehicle is [ten years of age or less and] model year 2000 or newer or has less than one
hundred fifty thousand miles on the odometer, the director of revenue shall retain the
odometer information provided in the vehicle inspection report, and provide for prompt
access to such information, together with the vehicle identification number for the motor
vehicle to which such information pertains, for a period of ten years after the receipt of such
information. This subsection shall not apply unless:
(1) The application for the vehicle's certificate of ownership was submitted after July
1, 1990; and
(2) The certificate was issued pursuant to a manufacturer's statement of origin.
4. If the vehicle qualifies as a reconstructed motor vehicle, motor change vehicle,
specially constructed motor vehicle, non-USA-std motor vehicle, as defined in section
301.010, or prior salvage as referenced in section 301.573, the owner or lienholder shall
surrender the certificate of ownership. The owner shall make an application for a new
certificate of ownership, pay the required title fee, and obtain the vehicle examination
certificate required pursuant to subsection 9 of section 301.190. If an insurance company
pays a claim on a salvage vehicle as defined in section 301.010 and the owner retains the
vehicle, as prior salvage, the vehicle shall only be required to meet the examination
requirements under subsection 10 of section 301.190. Notarized bills of sale along with a
copy of the front and back of the certificate of ownership for all major component parts
installed on the vehicle and invoices for all essential parts which are not defined as major
component parts shall accompany the application for a new certificate of ownership. If the
vehicle is a specially constructed motor vehicle, as defined in section 301.010, two pictures of
the vehicle shall be submitted with the application. If the vehicle is a kit vehicle, the
applicant shall submit the invoice and the manufacturer's statement of origin on the kit. If the
vehicle requires the issuance of a special number by the director of revenue or a replacement
vehicle identification number, the applicant shall submit the required application and
application fee. All applications required under this subsection shall be submitted with any
applicable taxes which may be due on the purchase of the vehicle or parts. The director of

HB 2662 3
revenue shall appropriately designate "Reconstructed Motor Vehicle", "Motor Change
Vehicle", "Non-USA-Std Motor Vehicle", or "Specially Constructed Motor Vehicle" on the
current and all subsequent issues of the certificate of ownership of such vehicle.
5. Every insurance company that pays a claim for repair of a motor vehicle which as
the result of such repairs becomes a reconstructed motor vehicle as defined in section 301.010
or that pays a claim on a salvage vehicle as defined in section 301.010 and the owner is
retaining the vehicle shall in writing notify the owner of the vehicle, and in a first party claim,
the lienholder if a lien is in effect, that he is required to surrender the certificate of ownership,
and the documents and fees required pursuant to subsection 4 of this section to obtain a prior
salvage motor vehicle certificate of ownership or documents and fees as otherwise required
by law to obtain a salvage certificate of ownership, from the director of revenue. The
insurance company shall within thirty days of the payment of such claims report to the
director of revenue the name and address of such owner, the year, make, model, vehicle
identification number, and license plate number of the vehicle, and the date of loss and
payment.
6. Anyone who fails to comply with the requirements of this section shall be guilty of
a class B misdemeanor.
7. An applicant for registration may make a donation of one dollar to promote a
blindness education, screening and treatment program. The director of revenue shall collect
the donations and deposit all such donations in the state treasury to the credit of the blindness
education, screening and treatment program fund established in section 209.015. Moneys in
the blindness education, screening and treatment program fund shall be used solely for the
purposes established in section 209.015; except that the department of revenue shall retain no
more than one percent for its administrative costs. The donation prescribed in this subsection
is voluntary and may be refused by the applicant for registration at the time of issuance or
renewal. The director shall inquire of each applicant at the time the applicant presents the
completed application to the director whether the applicant is interested in making the one
dollar donation prescribed in this subsection.
8. An applicant for registration may make a donation of an amount not less than one
dollar to promote an organ donor program. The director of revenue shall collect the donations
and deposit all such donations in the state treasury to the credit of the organ donor program
fund as established in sections 194.297 to 194.304. Moneys in the organ donor program
fund shall be used solely for the purposes established in sections 194.297 to 194.304, except
that the department of revenue shall retain no more than one percent for its administrative
costs. The donation prescribed in this subsection is voluntary and may be refused by the
applicant for registration at the time of issuance or renewal. The director shall inquire of each
applicant at the time the applicant presents the completed application to the director whether

HB 2662 4
the applicant is interested in making a contribution not less than one dollar as prescribed in
this subsection.
9. An applicant for registration may make a donation of one dollar to the Missouri
medal of honor recipients fund. The director of revenue shall collect the donations and
deposit all such donations in the state treasury to the credit of the Missouri medal of honor
recipients fund as established in section 226.925. Moneys in the medal of honor recipients
fund shall be used solely for the purposes established in section 226.925, except that the
department of revenue shall retain no more than one percent for its administrative costs. The
100 donation prescribed in this subsection is voluntary and may be refused by the applicant for
101 registration at the time of issuance or renewal. The director shall inquire of each applicant at
102 the time the applicant presents the completed application to the director whether the applicant
103 is interested in making the one dollar donation prescribed in this subsection.
307.350. 1. The owner of every motor vehicle as defined in section 301.010 which is
required to be registered in this state, except:
(1) Motor vehicles having less than one hundred fifty thousand miles[, for the ten-
year period following their model year of manufacture] or of model year 2000 or newer,
excluding prior salvage vehicles immediately following a rebuilding process and vehicles
subject to the provisions of section 307.380;
(2) Those motor vehicles which are engaged in interstate commerce and are
proportionately registered in this state with the Missouri highway reciprocity commission,
although the owner may request that such vehicle be inspected by an official inspection
station, and a peace officer may stop and inspect such vehicles to determine whether the
mechanical condition is in compliance with the safety regulations established by the United
States Department of Transportation; and
(3) Historic motor vehicles registered pursuant to section 301.131;
(4) Vehicles registered in excess of twenty-four thousand pounds for a period of less
than twelve months;

shall submit such vehicles to a biennial inspection of their mechanism and equipment in
accordance with the provisions of sections 307.350 to 307.390 and obtain a certificate of
inspection and approval and a sticker, seal, or other device from a duly authorized official
inspection station. The inspection, except the inspection of school buses which shall be made
at the time provided in section 307.375, shall be made at the time prescribed in the rules and
regulations issued by the superintendent of the Missouri state highway patrol; but the
inspection of a vehicle shall not be made more than sixty days prior to the date of application
for registration or within sixty days of when a vehicle's registration is transferred; however, if
a vehicle was purchased from a motor vehicle dealer and a valid inspection had been made

HB 2662 5
within sixty days of the purchase date, the new owner shall be able to utilize an inspection
performed within ninety days prior to the application for registration or transfer. Any vehicle
manufactured as an even-numbered model year vehicle shall be inspected and approved
pursuant to the safety inspection program established pursuant to sections 307.350 to 307.390
in each even-numbered calendar year and any such vehicle manufactured as an odd-numbered
model year vehicle shall be inspected and approved pursuant to sections 307.350 to 307.390
in each odd-numbered year. The certificate of inspection and approval shall be a sticker, seal,
or other device or combination thereof, as the superintendent of the Missouri state highway
patrol prescribes by regulation and shall be displayed upon the motor vehicle or trailer as
prescribed by the regulations established by him. The replacement of certificates of
inspection and approval which are lost or destroyed shall be made by the superintendent of
the Missouri state highway patrol under regulations prescribed by him.
2. For the purpose of obtaining an inspection only, it shall be lawful to operate a
vehicle over the most direct route between the owner's usual place of residence and an
inspection station of such owner's choice, notwithstanding the fact that the vehicle does not
have a current state registration license. It shall also be lawful to operate such a vehicle from
an inspection station to another place where repairs may be made and to return the vehicle to
the inspection station notwithstanding the absence of a current state registration license.
3. No person whose motor vehicle was duly inspected and approved as provided in
this section shall be required to have the same motor vehicle again inspected and approved for
the sole reason that such person wishes to obtain a set of any special personalized license
plates available pursuant to section 301.144 or a set of any license plates available pursuant to
section 301.142, prior to the expiration date of such motor vehicle's current registration.
4. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 307.390, violation of this section shall
be deemed an infraction.
✔